Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-306 Authority to offer death,
sick, disability, or other benefits; deposit or bond. (a) The society
shall deposit with the commissioner fifty per cent of the minimum net worth
requirement provided in section 432:1-407(a)(2), either in cash or in
securities approved by the commissioner; provided that the deposit shall be no
less than $1,000,000 and shall not exceed $20,000,000.

(b) In lieu of such deposit, the society shall
file with the commissioner a good and sufficient bond in the amount prescribed
in subsection (a), signed by the society as principal with one or more sureties
to be approved by the commissioner and running to the commissioner and the
commissioner's successors in office. The bond shall be conditioned that the
surety or sureties on the bond shall be answerable in the amount of the bond
for all judgments, decrees or orders given, made or rendered against the
principal on the bond by any court of the State for payment of money. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 81, §11]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next